Maryland, session 2026, HB0840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–276.
(A) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY GRANT, BY LAW,
A TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX
IMPOSED ON A COMMERCIAL BUILDING THAT IS RENTED OR RENTED TO OWN AT
FAIR MARKET VALUE TO A SMALL BUSINESS IF THE COMMERCIAL BUILDING IS
LOCATED IN:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0840*

HOUSE BILL 840
(1) AN ARTS AND ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT DESIGNATED UNDER
TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE; OR
(2) A MAIN STREET MARYLAND COMMUNITY DESIGNATED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR:
(1) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION;
(2) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION;
(3) APPLICATION PROCEDURES FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION; AND
(4) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.